el: Στοχευόμενα παράσιτα: Φύκια; Λειχήνα; Καλούπι; Βρύο; Αγριόχορτο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Cielenie na škodcov: Riasy; Lišajníky; Plieseň; Mach; Burina; Iné
pt-BR: Pragas direcionadas: Algas; Líquen; Mofo; Musgo; Erva; Outro
ru: Целевые виды вредителей: Водоросли; Лишайник; Плесень; Мох; Трава; Другое
cs: Likvidovaní škůdci: Řasy; Lišejník; Forma; Mech; Plevel; Jiné
vi: Các loài gây hại: Tảo; Địa y; Khuôn; Rêu; Cỏ dại; Khác
th: ศัตรูพืชที่เป็นเป้าหมาย: สาหร่าย; ไลคอน; แม่พิมพ์; มอส; วัชพืช; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Ciljani nametnici: Alge; Lišajevi; Plijesan; Mahovina; Korov; Ostalo
zh-TW: 目標害蟲: 藻類; 地衣; 模具; 苔蘚; 雜草; 其他
ko: 표적 해충: 조류; 이끼; 금형; 이끼; 잡초; 기타
de: Eignung für Schädlingsart: Alge; Lichen; Form; Moos; Unkraut; Sonstiges
pl: Zwalczane szkodniki: Glony; Porosty; Forma; Mech; Chwast; Inne
nb: Målrettede skadedyr: Alger; Lav; Form; Mose; Ugress; Annet
sv: Avsedda skadedjur: Alger; Lav; Form; Mossa; Ogräs; Övrigt
ro-RO: Dăunători vizați: Alge; Lichen; Mucegai; Mușchi; Buruieni; Altele
nl: Bestemd voor ongedierte: Algen; Lichen; Mal; Mos; Onkruid; Andere
bg-BG: Целеви вредители: Водорасли; Лишеи; Мухъл; Мъх; Плевели; Други
lt-LT: Naikinami kenkėjai: Dumbliai; Kerpės; Pelėsis; Samanos; Piktžolė; Kita
en: Targeted pests: Algae; Lichen; Mold; Moss; Weed; Other
ja: 対象となる微生物・植物: 藻類; 苔癬; 型; 苔; 雑草; その他
es: Plagas específicas: Algas; Liquen; Molde; Musgo; Maleza; Otros
zh-CN: 目标害虫: 藻类; 青苔; 模具; 苔藓; 杂草; 其他
fi: Kohteena olevat tuholaiset: Levä; Jäkälä; Muotti; Sammal; Rikkaruohot; Muu
fr: Ravageurs ciblés: Algues; Lichen; Moule; Mousse; Herbe; Autre
pt-PT: Eliminação de pragas específicas: Algas; Líquen; Mofo; Musgo; Erva; Outro
tr: Hedeflenen zararlılar: Su yosunları; Liken; Kalıp; Yosun; Otlar; Diğer
da: Målrettede skadedyr: Alger; Lav; Form; Mos; Ukrudt; Andet
sl-SI: Ciljni škodljivci: Alge; Lišaj; Plesen; Mah; Plevel; Drugo
hu: Célzott kártevők: Alga; Zuzmó; Penész; Moha; Gyom; Egyéb
it: Parassiti specifici: Alghe; Lichene; Stampo; Muschio; Erbacce; Altro